Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2917.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 36, chapter 1, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 36-133.01, to read: START_STATUTE36-133.01. Firefighter cancer registry; use of information collected; reporting requirements; confidentiality; definition A. The department shall establish and administer a firefighter cancer registry for the purpose of collecting, maintaining and analyzing data regarding the incidence of cancer among firefighters in this state. The firefighter cancer registry shall be administered in compliance with all applicable state and federal confidentiality and privacy laws, including the health insurance portability and accountability act of 1996. B. aFTER RECEIVING WRITTEN CONSENT FROM A FIREFIGHTER who is eligible to be included in the firefighter cancer registry, or the firefighter's authorized designee if the firefighter is deceased, The department shall collect, to the extent practicable, the following information for the firefighter: 1. the FIREFIGHTER'S Age at the time of the cancer diagnosis. 2. the FIREFIGHTER'S Gender. 3. the Type of cancer diagnosed. 4. the Date of diagnosis. 5. the Stage of cancer at diagnosis, if available. 6. the FIREFIGHTER'S Length of service as a firefighter. 7. the FIREFIGHTER'S Current and prior fire departments, fire districts or duty stations. 8. the FIREFIGHTER'S Job classification or primary duties. 9. Exposure-related information, if available, including the duration and type of occupational exposure. 10. Whether the firefighter is active, retired or deceased at the time of reporting. 11. Any other data elements the department determines are necessary to fulfill the purposes of the registry. C. for the purposes of the firefighter cancer registry, The department may collect information from any of the following sources: 1. Fire departments and fire districts. 2. Health care providers and health care facilities. 3. The Arizona cancer registry or other existing cancer surveillance systems. 4. Workers' compensation insurers or administrators. 5. Firefighters or a firefighter's authorized designee, on a voluntary basis. D. A firefighter who is diagnosed with cancer while employed as a firefighter in this state or after separation from service MAY participate in the firefighter cancer registry to the extent the diagnosis is known to a person or entity described in subsection C of this section. A firefighter is not required to personally submit medical information if the information is otherwise collected pursuant to subsection C of this section. E. Health care providers, health care facilities, fire departments and fire districts that obtain information RELATING TO A FIREFIGHTER WHO HAS PROVIDED THE DEPARTMENT of health services with WRITTEN CONSENT AND THAT FIREFIGHTER'S cancer diagnosis shall report the information to the department of health services in the manner and form prescribed by the department of health services.  Fire departments and fire districts shall provide employment and service-related information as prescribed in subsection B of this section that is requested by the department of health services. F. All personal identifying information collected pursuant to this section is confidential and is not subject to public inspection or disclosure pursuant to title 39, chapter 1. G. The department may use aggregated and de-identified data from the firefighter cancer registry for: 1. Public health research. 2. Statistical analysis. 3. Reports to the governor and the legislature. 4. The development of cancer prevention strategies and occupational exposure-reduction policies. H. Information contained in the firefighter cancer registry may not be used to determine an individual firefighter's eligibility for workers' compensation benefits, retirement benefits or insurance coverage. I. On or before December 31, 2027, and annually thereafter, the department shall submit a written report to the governor, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives, and shall submit a copy to the secretary of state, summarizing aggregated data and trends identified through the firefighter cancer registry. The report shall include, at a minimum: 1. The number of firefighters included in the registry. 2. The types and prevalence of cancers reported. 3. Trends related to age and years of service. 4. Geographic or departmental patterns, if identifiable. 5. Any recommendations for legislative action. J. For the purposes of this section, "Firefighter" means an individual who is employed by or who serves on a full-time, part-time, volunteer, paid-on-call or reserve basis with a public or private fire department or fire district and who is engaged in fire suppression, emergency medical services, hazardous materials response, rescue services or related duties. END_STATUTE